Hawaii statutes.
[§200-30] Reciprocal agreements and
courtesy. The department may enter into, amend, revise, suspend, or revoke
reciprocal agreements or arrangements with appropriate and duly authorized
agencies of other jurisdictions whereby vessels properly numbered and equipped
under the laws and regulations of this State are granted the same or
substantially similar privileges, exemptions, and benefits enjoyed by vessels
properly registered and equipped in such other jurisdictions in exchange for
substantially similar privileges, exemptions, and benefits granted to properly
registered and equipped vessels from other jurisdictions by the State. The
department by appropriate rules may define the extent and nature of privileges,
exemptions, and benefits which may be extended, as a matter of courtesy, to
vessels properly numbered and equipped in other jurisdictions not covered by
reciprocal agreements or arrangements.

Notwithstanding the preceding language of this
section, the department shall recognize the validity of a number awarded to any
vessel by:

(1) Another state under a numbering system approved
by the Coast Guard under appropriate federal laws and requirements; or

(2) By the Coast Guard, for a period of at least
sixty days. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next